Mississippi statutes. Title 47. Prisons and Prisoners; Probation and Parole
Drug Identification Program

§ 47-5-601.
Establishment of program by Department of Corrections.

The Mississippi Department of Corrections is authorized to establish a drug identification program and shall have the power and duty to adopt rules not inconsistent with law as it may deem proper and necessary with respect to the establishment, administration and operation of the program.

HISTORY:
Laws, 1983, ch. 435, § 1, eff from and after passage (approved March 30, 1983).

§ 47-5-603.
Participation in program; submission to chemical analysis test.

Any offender on probation or released from a facility of the Department of Corrections on parole or earned probation who remains under the supervision of the Department of Corrections or any offender who is incarcerated in a state correctional facility may be required to participate in the Mississippi Department of Corrections drug identification program. Participation by an offender would consist of submission by the offender, from time to time and upon the request of a parole or probation supervisor, or authorized personnel of the department to any type of breath, saliva or urine chemical analysis test, the purpose of which is to detect the possible presence of alcohol or a substance prohibited or controlled by any law of the State of Mississippi or the United States.

HISTORY:
Laws, 1983, ch. 435, § 2; Laws, 1991, ch. 437 § 1; Laws, 1998, ch. 314, § 1, eff from and after July 1, 1998.

§ 47-5-605.
Fees and costs for administering chemical analysis test.

Each time the results of such a chemical analysis test indicate the unauthorized presence of alcohol or a controlled substance in the parolee or probationer, he or she shall be required to pay a fee of Ten Dollars ($10.00) to the Mississippi Department of Corrections drug identification program, which fee shall be used to pay for the cost of administering that particular test. All other costs of the program, including the costs of administering such tests in cases in which the presence of alcohol or a controlled substance is not found, will be paid by expenditures from the community service revolving fund as described in Section 47-7-49.

HISTORY:
Laws, 1983, ch. 435, § 3, eff from and after passage (approved March 30, 1983).